Florida, session 2026, HB491.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (f) is added to subsection (1) of
section 741.325, Florida Statutes, to read:
741.325 Requirements for batterers' intervention
programs.—
(1) A batterers' intervention program must meet the
following requirements:
(f) A program may offer supplemental faith-based
activities to participants; however, participation in such
activities may not be required as part of the program.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb491 -00-er